Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2445.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 27, 1996 (P.L.403, No.58), known as the Community and Economic Development Enhancement Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 17OFFICE OF HOUSING OPPORTUNITYSection 1701. Definitions.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory committee." The Housing Opportunity Advisory Committee established in section 1705."Agency." The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency. "Housing production targets." The housing production targets under section 1706."OTO." The Pennsylvania Office of Transformation and Opportunity established by Executive Order 2023-05."Office." The Office of Housing Opportunity established under section 1702.Section 1702. Office of Housing Opportunity.The Office of Housing Opportunity is established in the department.Section 1703. Deputy secretary.The Governor shall appoint a Deputy Secretary for Housing Opportunity, who shall be responsible for the administration of the office.Section 1704. Powers and duties.The office shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Administering the functions specified in section 301(a)(6), (9) and (14).(2) Chairing and making certain appointments to the advisory committee as approved under section 1705.(3) Adopting and publishing housing production targets every 10 years based on the recommendations of the advisory committee and implementing policies to meet the housing production targets.(4) Publishing an annual report detailing progress 20260HB2445PN3255 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 toward the housing production targets.(5) Collaborating with the OTO to meet housing production targets established under this chapter.(6) Coordinating with the agency to ensure comprehensive delivery of housing financing assistance.(7) Administering the Residential Economic Development District Grant Program under section 1709.(8) Promulgating the rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.Section 1705. Advisory committee.(a) Establishment.--The Housing Opportunity Advisory Committee is established within the office.(b) Membership.--The committee shall consist of the following members:(1) The Deputy Secretary of Housing Opportunity or a designee, who shall serve as chairperson of the committee.(2) The secretary or a designee. (3) The Secretary of Environmental Protection or a designee.(4) The Secretary of Policy and Planning in the Governor's Policy Office or a designee.(5) The Secretary of Health or a designee. (6) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee. (7) Four members of the General Assembly, including: (i) One member of the Senate, appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(ii) One member of the Senate, appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(iii) One member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.20260HB2445PN3255 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) One member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(8) Four representatives of local government, appointed by the Deputy Secretary of Housing Opportunity, including:(i) One representative of county government representing rural communities.(ii) One representative of county government representing urban or suburban communities.(iii) One representative of municipal government representing rural communities.(iv) One representative of municipal government representing urban or suburban communities.(9) Nine members, appointed by the Deputy Secretary of Housing Opportunity, who reside in this Commonwealth and have extensive knowledge of at least one of the following areas:(i) Residential real estate construction. (ii) Residential real estate development or financing.(iii) Residential real estate ownership. (iv) Local government planning and regulations. (v) Local permitting and licensing. (vi) Civil engineering. (vii) Environmental engineering. (viii) Historic preservation. (ix) The housing needs of low-income individuals. (c) Terms.--A member of the advisory committee shall serve for the duration of the term of the appointing authority. A member may be removed for cause by the member's appointing authority.20260HB2445PN3255 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Compensation and expenses.--Members of the advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive reimbursement for necessary and proper expenses for attendance at meetings.(e) Meetings and quorum.-- (1) The advisory committee shall meet at least quarterly and upon the call of the chairperson at other times as deemed necessary.(2) Twelve members of the advisory committee shall constitute a quorum.(f) Declared vacancies.--The Deputy Secretary of Housing Opportunity shall declare a vacancy to exist on the advisory committee whenever any member appointed by the Deputy Secretary fails to attend three consecutive meetings without good cause. A declared vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term.(g) Staff.--The office shall provide staff for the advisory committee.(h) Duties.--The advisory committee shall: (1) Study and make recommendations on ways that the Commonwealth and local governments can improve housing supply and housing affordability.(2) Identify and assess factors that impact housing supply and housing affordability, including:(i) Labor and material costs. (ii) Taxes and fees. (iii) Access to financing and capital investment. (iv) Planning, zoning and land use regulations. (v) State building code standards. (vi) Appeals and other legal barriers. (vii) State and local permitting and approval 20260HB2445PN3255 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 processes.(viii) The availability of land for housing. (ix) Creating and financing affordable housing. (x) Infrastructure. (i) Report.--On or before March 30, 2027, and every two years thereafter, the advisory committee shall report its findings and recommendations to the office. The office shall transmit the report to the OTO and to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 1706. Housing production targets.(a) Target report.--The office shall publish a report, on or before July 1, 2027, and every 10 years thereafter, establishing housing production targets. The following shall apply:(1) The housing production targets shall be established for:(i) The Commonwealth. (ii) Each local jurisdiction, which shall include: (A) Each county. (B) Each municipality that exercises zoning or planning authority.(2) In establishing the housing production targets, the office shall:(i) Analyze data and forecasts related to: (A) Employment demand. (B) Housing demand. (C) Population growth. (D) The ratio of median household income wage 20260HB2445PN3255 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 growth to increases in home prices and rental costs, which shall be treated as evidence of unmet housing need and housing underproduction.(E) Any other related information. (ii) Utilize the data and consider the recommendations contained in each report issued by the advisory committee under section 1705 since the prior report required by this section.(iii) Consult with each local jurisdiction that may have housing production targets.(3) The office shall transmit the report to the OTO and to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The office shall publish the current housing production targets on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and notify each applicable local jurisdiction of the housing production targets in a timely manner.(5) The publication under paragraph (4) shall provide a supporting basis for the housing production targets.(b) Progress report.--The office shall publish a report on or before July 1, 2028, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, detailing progress made toward the housing production targets established under subsection (a). The following shall apply:(1) The report shall: (i) Identify the housing production targets for the 20260HB2445PN3255 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth and each local jurisdiction.(ii) Assess the progress of the Commonwealth and each local jurisdiction with meeting applicable housing production targets.(iii) Provide a supporting basis for any alteration to an established housing production target.(iv) Disaggregate housing production targets and outcomes by:(A) Income level, including extremely low-income households at or below 30% of area median income.(B) Housing stability risk, including populations experiencing homelessness or at risk of homelessness.(C) Disability status. (D) Fixed income. (E) Number of housing units that are affordable to extremely low-income households at or below 30% of area median income.(2) The office may not consider housing production that has been approved or similarly authorized but construction has not commenced when determining the progress of the Commonwealth or a local jurisdiction with meeting applicable housing production targets under this section.(3) The report shall provide potential solutions to assist the Commonwealth or a local jurisdiction with meeting applicable housing production targets in the report required under this section.(4) The office shall transmit the report to the OTO and to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate and the 20260HB2445PN3255 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The office shall not be required to provide a report under this section in the same year that a housing production target report is required under subsection (a).Section 1707. Bureau of Housing Finance Liaison (Reserved).Section 1708. Commonwealth Housing Ombudsman (Reserved).Section 1709. Residential Economic Development District Grant Program (Reserved).Section 1710. Residential Construction Workforce Training Grant Program (Reserved).Section 1711. Residential construction permitting time frames (Reserved).Section 1712. Municipal building permit review (Reserved).Section 1713. Preapproved housing permitting approval (Reserved).Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2445PN3255 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718